Idaho, session 2026, H0890.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5709A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 58-331, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
58-331. DESIGNATION OF SURPLUS REAL PROPERTY. Real property of the
state of Idaho, the use of which by any department, officer, board, com-
mission or other administrative agency of the state shall be terminated by
law, and real property in the custody and control of any such agency which
the agency shall declare to be no longer useful to or usable by it, shall be
deemed surplus, and, except as set forth in section 67-5709A, Idaho Code,
custody and control thereof shall thereupon be vested in and title be trans-
ferred to the state board of land commissioners, subject to disposition by
said board in accordance with the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-2024A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2024A. AUTHORIZATION FOR DISPOSAL OF STATE SURPLUS PROPERTY. The
state board of examiners shall authorize:
(1) The disposal of state surplus real property classified as "state
administrative facilities" in accordance with section 67-5709A, Idaho Code,
excluding real property as set forth in section 58-331, Idaho Code; and
(2) The the disposal of state surplus personal property in accordance
with section 67-5732A, Idaho Code, and in compliance with the internal
management policies and procedures for state surplus personal property as
adopted by the board.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.